West Virginia, session 2025, HB2671.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 21. Personal Income Tax. Part II. Residents. §11-21-27. Income tax exemption for gym memberships in West Virginia. There shall be an income tax exemption for those West Virginians who have gym memberships at gyms within the state. This exemption shall be $60 per month and be capped at $720 per year.